Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Certification of Certain Retired Law Enforcement Officers to Carry Concealed Weapon Without Permit

§ 45-1-101.
Certain retired law enforcement officers may obtain certification from Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police to carry concealed weapon without permit.

This section may be referred to as the “HR218 Qualification Law.”

Any retired law enforcement officer who resides in this state and for whom the law enforcement agency from which the officer retired does not participate in the necessary certification for the retired officer to be certified according to the Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004 found at Title 18, Chapter 44, Section 926B, USC, or who does not reside in convenient proximity to the law enforcement agency from which the officer retired, may obtain the necessary certification from the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 480, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.